csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_VV.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenig
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ateg
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atesininig
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atesinog
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenigiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ategiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atesininigiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atesinoogiban
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenigwen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ategwen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atenigobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: ategobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: atesininigobanen
     ate+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: atesinoogobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininig
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinog
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininigiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoogiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininiigwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoogwen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiinigobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiigobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininigobanen
     gonzaabii+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoogobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanig
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaag
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininig
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinog
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanigiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaagiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininigiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinoogiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanigwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaagwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininiigwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinoogwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaanigobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaagobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: michaasininigobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: michaasinoogobanen
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: ateniwan
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: atewan
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: ateni
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: ate
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: atesininiwan
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: atesinoon
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: atesinini
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: atesinoon
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [ateniibaniin,ateniibanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [atebaniin,atebanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: ateniiban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: ateban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [atesininiibaniin,atesininiibanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [atesinoobaniin,atesinoobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: atesininiiban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: atesinooban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: ateniwidogen
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: atedogen
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: ateniwidog
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: atedog
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: atesininiwidogen
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: atesinodogen
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: atesininiwidog
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: atesinodog
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [atenigobaniin,atenigobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [ategobaniin,ategobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: atenigoban
     ate+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: ategoban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [atesininigobaniin,atesininigobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [atesinoogobaniin,atesinoogobanen]
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: atesininigoban
     ate+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: atesinoogoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiiniwan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiiwan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiini
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabii
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininiwan
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoon
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiisinini
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoon
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [gonzaabiiniibaniin,gonzaabiiniibanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [gonzaabiibaniin,gonzaabiibanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiiniiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabiiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [gonzaabiisininiibaniin,gonzaabiisininiibanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [ginzaabiisinoobaniin,ginzaabiisinoobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiisininiiban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabiisinooban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiiniwidogen
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiidogen
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiiniwidog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabiidog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: gonzaabiisininiwidogen
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: gonzaabiisinodogen
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiisininiwidog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabiisinodog
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [gonzaabiinigobaniin,gonzaabiinigobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [gonzaabiigobaniin,gonzaabiigobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiinigoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabiigoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [gonzaabiisininigobaniin,gonzaabiisininigobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [gonzaabiisinoogobaniin,gonzaabiisinoogobanen]
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: gonzaabiisininigoban
     gonzaabii+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: gonzaabiisinoogoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: michaaniwan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: michaawan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: michaani
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: michaa
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: michaasininiwan
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: michaasinoon
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: michaasinini
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: michaasinoon
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [michaaniibaniin,michaaniibanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [michaabaniin,michaabanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: michaaniiban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: michaaban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [michaasininiibaniin,michaasininiibanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [michaasinoobaniin,michaasinoobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: michaasininiiban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: michaasinooban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: michaaniwidogen
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: michaadogen
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: michaaniwidog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: michaadog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: michaasininiwidogen
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: michaasinodogen
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: michaasininiwidog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: michaasinodog
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [michaanigobaniin,michaagobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [michaagobaniin,michaagobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: michaanigoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: michaagoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [michaasininigobaniin,michaasininigobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [michaasinoogobaniin,michaasinoogobanen]
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: michaasininigoban
     michaa+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: michaasinoogoban
